Massachusetts, session 194th, H879.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 30A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 20 the
following 3 sections:-
Section 20A: (a) A town may postpone any town meeting for up to 14 calendar days,
with the approval of the moderator, provided that a short-term emergency prevents the meeting
from taking place at the scheduled place and time.
(b) The moderator shall provide notice of the rescheduled town meeting, in a manner
consistent with the notice provisions for a regularly scheduled town meeting, not less than 48
hours before the rescheduled meeting will take place.
of 3

(c) All actions taken pursuant to this section are hereby ratified, validated and confirmed
to the same extent as if the town meeting had been conducted in accordance with all other
applicable laws, charter provisions, ordinances and by-laws.
Section 20B: (a) In an emergency that is expected to last more than 14 days, a town may
request approval from the attorney general’s office to hold a town meeting according to the rules
established in section 20 of chapter 20 of the acts of 2021. The chair of the select board or board
of selectmen, along with the moderator, shall submit a written request to the attorney general’s
office requesting to meet according to said section 20 of chapter 20 of the acts of 2021,
explaining the nature of the emergency and how long they anticipate the emergency will last.
(b) Provided that the attorney general’s office provides the town with written approval to
meet according to said section 20 of chapter 20 of the acts of 2021 for a specified length of time,
all actions taken pursuant to this section are hereby ratified, validated and confirmed to the same
extent as if the town meeting had been conducted in accordance with all other applicable laws,
charter provisions, ordinances and by-laws.
Section 20C. (a) In an emergency that is expected to last more than 14 days, a town may
request approval from the attorney general’s office to hold public meetings and hearings
according to the rules established in section 20 of chapter 20 of the acts of 2021. The chair of the
select board or board of selectmen, or mayor, shall submit a written request to the attorney
general’s office requesting that public meetings be held according to section 20 of chapter 20 of
the acts of 2021, explaining the nature of the emergency and how long they anticipate the
emergency will last.
of 3

(b) Provided that the attorney general’s office provides the town with written approval to
meet according to section 20 of chapter 20 of the acts of 2021 for a specified length of time, all
actions taken pursuant to this section are hereby ratified, validated and confirmed to the same
extent as if the town meeting had been conducted in accordance with all other applicable laws,
charter provisions, ordinances and by-laws.
of 3